Nevada, session 83, SB205.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.5303 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.5303 1. In addition to the methods described in NRS
293.530, the county clerk in each county [may enter into an
agreement with the United States Postal Service] shall use, or
contract with any person authorized by [it] the United States Postal
Service to [obtain] use, the data compiled by the United States
Postal Service concerning changes of addresses of its postal patrons
[for use by the county clerk] to correct the portions of the statewide
voter registration list relevant to the county clerk.
2. The county clerk shall publish on the Internet website of
the county clerk the number of persons removed from the
statewide voter registration list pursuant to this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.5307 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5307 [If a county clerk enters into an agreement pursuant
to NRS 293.5303, the] A county clerk shall review each notice of a
change of address filed with the United States Postal Service by a
resident of the county and which is obtained by the county clerk
pursuant to NRS 293.5303 and identify each resident who is a
registered voter and has moved to a new address. Before removing
or correcting information in the statewide voter registration list, the
county clerk shall mail a notice to each such registered voter and
follow the procedures set forth in NRS 293.530.
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 4. 1. This section and section 3 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
-
*SB205*

– 3 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB205*